Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Certificate of Registration

§ 33-7-201.
Certificates required; license required for shops and schools.

No person shall practice or attempt to practice barbering without a certificate to practice as a registered barber. No person shall operate a barbershop or school unless it is at all times under the direct supervision and management of a registered barber. No person shall employ another as a barber unless the person so employed holds an unexpired certificate of registration or permit issued by the board.

No person, association, partnership, or corporation shall establish or operate a barbershop or school of barbering in the state without first securing and holding a license from the board. Application for a license shall be made in writing on forms furnished by the board. The board may require to be furnished information reasonably necessary for its purposes. The board shall establish by rule and regulation standards for licensing barbershops and schools.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 11-103; Laws 1935, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-403; W.S. 1957, § 33-89; Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

See also §

33-7-108

, requiring a shop license.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), redesignating the former undesignated paragraph as (a); and in (a) deleted the exception to W.S. 33-7-306 at the beginning, and inserted “or school.”

Purpose of act. —

Chapter 67, Laws 1931, is designed to improve sanitary conditions in barbershops. Unemployment Compensation Act. Tharp v. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n, 57 Wyo. 486, 121 P.2d 172,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1942).

Constitutional question not fully presented. —

Supreme Court will not answer constitutional questions which are not fully presented where there is no need to consider questions thus submitted. Unemployment Compensation Act. Tharp v. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n, 57 Wyo. 486, 121 P.2d 172,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1942).

Percentage basis work within Unemployment Compensation Act. —

Where barber work was done by barbers in operator's shop on percentage basis, shop being licensed, leased and controlled by operator, who also controlled scope of work and supplied materials (but not tools), operator was liable for contributions under Unemployment Compensation Act, §§

27-3-101

to

27-3-704

(now Wyoming Employment Security Law, §§

27-3-101

to

27-3-705

). Unemployment Compensation Act. Tharp v. Unemployment Comp. Comm'n, 57 Wyo. 486, 121 P.2d 172,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1942).

§ 33-7-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 7, related to the issuance of a certificate.

§ 33-7-203.
When granted without examination.

An applicant for a registered barber certificate, who is qualified and currently holds a registered barber certificate in another state or country, upon submitting an application to the board, with proof that he meets or exceeds the requirements to receive a registered barber certificate in this state as prescribed by board rule and regulation, and upon payment of the required fee, may receive a registered barber certificate by endorsement without examination in this state subject to the following:

An applicant from another state or country which does not require a board examination or who has not graduated from a state approved program shall not obtain a certificate by endorsement; and

An applicant who holds a valid, unexpired barbers license or certificate from another state that does not require a board examination and who has graduated from a barber school or college, upon application and payment of the required fee may be issued a temporary permit to practice as a barber under the supervision of a registered barber in this state until the next examination scheduled by the board. Each applicant may receive only one (1) temporary permit.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 11-109; C.S. 1945, § 37-409; W.S. 1957, § 33-91; Laws 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, substituting the present requirements for obtaining a license without examination for the former provisions, which allowed for licensure without examination where a person, prior to 1931, had practiced barbering, was an apprentice to a barber or was a student in a school of barbering.

§ 33-7-204.
Fees.

The board shall establish and collect fees pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

for the certificates, licenses, permits and examinations indicated:

Registered barber’s examination;

Certificate of registration, initial or renewal;

Duplicate certificate;

Temporary permit to practice;

Restoration fee, certificate of registration;

Barbershop license;

Barber school license.

Certificates of registration for barbers and barbershop and barber school licenses expire on July 1 following their issuance. Any person who qualifies for a certificate under W.S.

33-7-209

or a barbershop or barber school license as prescribed by board rule and regulation and pays required fees shall be issued a certificate or renewal.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 136, § 2.

The board may declare forfeit the examination fee of any applicant who fails to appear for examination at two (2) successive meetings of the board for the examination of applicants.

and (f) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

The board shall establish and collect fees to recover costs for publication and distribution of registers, lists and booklets, for records and affidavits processed, and for educational programs.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 11-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-408; W.S. 1957, § 33-92; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 5; 1973, ch. 202, § 1; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “licenses” after “certificates”; added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii); in (b), twice inserted references to barbershop and barber school licenses; repealed former (e), pertaining to duplicate certificates, and former (f), pertaining to temporary certificates; and added (g).

§ 33-7-205.
Restoration following expiration or retirement.

Any formerly registered barber whose certificate of registration has expired may within five (5) years of the date of expiration have his certificate restored immediately upon payment of the restoration fee in addition to other renewal fees. Any registered barber who retires from the practice of barbering for more than five (5) years may not renew his certificate of registration. Any registered barber whose certificate has expired and who does not qualify for a certificate by endorsement as provided in W.S.

33-7-203

shall be required to pass the board administered examination and pay all related examination and certification fees as set forth in board rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 11-112; C.S. 1945, § 37-412; W.S. 1957, § 33-93; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 6; 1973, ch. 202, § 1; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, extending the time a person may not practice before he has to pay a renewal fee and extending the time a person may retire before he is prohibited from renewing his certificate without passing an exam and paying the required fees.

§ 33-7-206.
Display.

Every holder of a certificate of registration shall display it in a conspicuous place adjacent to or near his work chair. Every holder of a barbershop or barber school license shall display it in a conspicuous place for public viewing.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 11-111; C.S. 1945, § 37-411; W.S. 1957, § 33-94; Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added last sentence.

§ 33-7-207.
Refusal to issue or renew; revocation; suspension; denial.

The board may revoke, suspend, deny, or refuse to issue or renew any certificate of registration or barbershop or barber school license, or may otherwise censure the holder of a certificate of registration or barbershop or barber school license for any of the following causes:

Making a false statement on an application to the board;

Gross malpractice or gross incompetency;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements;

Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice, under a trade name other than one’s own;

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

Unprofessional conduct; and

Violation of any of the provisions of this act or board rule and regulation.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 11-112; C.S. 1945, § 37-412; W.S. 1957, § 33-95; Laws 1974, ch. 6, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the introductory language in (a) added that the board has the authority to suspend, deny, and censure, and added provisions for barbershop and barber school licenses; repealed former (a)(iii), which related to practice by a person with a contagious disease, and former (a)(vi), which pertained to a person with habitual drunkenness or addiction; in (a)(viii), added reference to violation of board rule or regulation; and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-7-101(a)(vi).

Cross references. —

As to what constitutes a felony, see §

6-10-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

§ 33-7-208.
Notice and hearing for revocation.

Except as provided in W.S. 33-7-207(b), the board may refuse to renew or may revoke, deny or suspend any license or certificate of registration issued under this act as provided in W.S.

33-7-107

[repealed] after twenty (20) days written notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

Hearing and notice requirements shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 11-113; C.S. 1945, § 37-413; W.S. 1957, § 33-96; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section to provide that the board may refuse to renew or may revoke, deny or suspend a license, certificate, or registration by following procedural requirements of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-7-101(a)(vi).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

§ 33-7-209.
Qualifications for registration as barber; examination.

A certificate of registration to practice barbering shall be issued upon passage of a board administered or board approved examination, and upon meeting all requirements set forth by board rule and regulation, to any person who files a completed application, accompanied by the required fees and documentation and who:

Has graduated from an approved barber school or college, has an education equivalent to the completion of the second year of high school and is at least seventeen (17) years of age;

Has a valid, unexpired license as a barber from another state or country which has licensing requirements for barbers that meet or exceed the requirements for certification in Wyoming; or

Is a cosmetologist or hair stylist licensed under W.S.

33-12-119

through

33-12-140

, has completed training at an approved barber school or college as set forth in board rules and regulations and passed an examination conducted by the board to determine his fitness for practice.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 42, § 2.

An applicant for a certificate of registration to practice as a registered barber who fails to pass an examination conducted by the board, may be examined at the next examination.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 11-105; C.S. 1945, § 37-405; W.S. 1957, § 33-97; Laws 1967, ch. 57, § 3; 1975, ch. 41, § 1; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, §§ 1, 2; ch. 98, § 1; 2015 ch. 26, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “W.S.33-12-119 through

33-12-140

” for “W.S.

33-12-101

through 33-12-118.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(iii), inserted “or hair stylist.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

inserted present (a)(vi) and redesignated former (a)(vi) as (a)(vii).

Laws 2015, ch. 26, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 33-7-210.
Application for examination.

Each applicant for an examination shall make application to the board on blank forms prepared and furnished by the board and shall submit proper credentials and all required fees as required by the board no less than fifteen (15) days before the examination is to be given.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 11-106; C.S. 1945, § 37-406; W.S. 1957, § 33-98; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section to delete the oath requirements, and to include a fifteen (15) day minimum for submission of credentials and fees before examination is to be given.

§ 33-7-211.
Time and character of examinations.

The examination required under W.S. 33-7-209(a) shall be conducted at a time and place chosen by the board and given at least once every six (6) months. Examinations shall not be confined to any specific method or system, may consist of oral, written and performance examinations, and shall be of the scope and character to disclose that any person passing the examination is qualified to receive a registered barber certificate. Examinations shall be held in the presence of at least one (1) member of the board or a qualified examiner as determined by board rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 67, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 11-121; C.S. 1945, § 37-421; W.S. 1957, § 33-99; Laws 1961, ch. 193, § 7; 1985, ch. 136, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added provisions to allow the exam to be given by any method or system that would disclose the applicant is qualified to receive a registered barber certificate, added the provision that a qualified examiner may monitor the exam, and updated an internal reference.

Severability. —

Section 24, ch. 67, Laws 1931, reads: “If any portion of this act is declared unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, it shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the act, which can be given effect without the invalid portion.”